Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 4
VOTING MACHINES

1-7-401. Judges to inspect machines.

In each polling location using voting machines, the election judges shall meet at the polling location before the time set for the opening of the polls at each election. Before the polls are open for election, each judge shall carefully examine each machine used in the polling location to ensure that no vote has yet been cast and that every counter, except the protective counter, registers zero.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 743, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 721, § 69, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-401 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-402. Sample ballots - ballot labels.

The designated election official shall provide each polling location in which voting machines are to be used with two sample ballots, which shall be arranged in the form of a diagram showing the front of the voting machine as it will appear after the official ballot labels are arranged thereon for voting on election day. The sample ballots may be either in full or reduced size and shall be delivered and submitted for public inspection in the same manner as provided by law for sample ballots used in nonmachine voting.

The designated election official shall also prepare the official ballot for each voting machine and shall place the official ballot on each voting machine to be used in polling locations under the election official's supervision and shall deliver the required number of voting machines to each polling location no later than the day before the polling locations open.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 743, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 775, § 51, effective May 20.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 721, § 70, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-402 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-403. Instruction to electors.

In case any elector, after entering the immediate voting area, asks for further instructions concerning the manner of voting, an election judge shall give instructions to the elector. No election judge or other election official or person assisting an elector shall enter the immediate voting area, except as provided in section 1-7-111. After receiving instructions, the elector shall vote as if unassisted.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 743, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 563, § 16, effective May 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-403 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7-404. Judge to watch voting machine.

No person shall deface or damage any voting machine or the ballot thereon. The election judges shall designate at least one election judge to be stationed beside the entrance to the voting machine during the entire period of the election to see that it is properly closed after each voter has entered. At such intervals as may be deemed necessary, the election judge shall also examine the face of the machine to ascertain whether it has been defaced or damaged, to detect any wrongdoing, and to repair any damage.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 744, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-404 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7-405. Seal on voting machine.

The designated election official shall supply each election precinct with a seal for each voting machine to be used in the precinct for the purpose of sealing the machine after the polls are closed. The designated election official shall also provide an envelope for the return of the keys to each voting machine along with the election returns.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 744, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-405 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7-406. Close of polls and count - seals.

As soon as the polls are closed on election day, the election judges shall immediately lock and seal each voting machine against further voting, and it shall so remain for a period of thirty days unless otherwise ordered by the court and except as provided in section 1-7-407. Immediately after each machine is locked and sealed, the election judges shall open the counting compartment and proceed to count the votes. After the total vote for each candidate and ballot issue has been ascertained, the election judges shall record on a certificate the number of votes cast, in numerical figures only, and return it to the designated election official.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 744, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1621, § 3, effective May 31.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 722, § 71, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-406 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-407. Close of polls - primary.

In the event no election contest is filed by any candidate in a primary election within the time prescribed by section 1-11-203, the county clerk and recorder may unlock and break the seals of voting machines at any time after the fifteenth day following the date of the primary election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 744, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1767, § 8, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-406 (2) as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7-408. Judges to keep accounting forms. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 744, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.